California statutes. Probate Code
(b) Publication pursuant to Section 6063a of the Government Code in a newspaper in the county in which the proceedings are pending, such publication to be completed before:

(1) In the case of a private sale, the day specified in the notice of sale as the day on or after which the sale is to be made.

(2) In the case of a public auction sale, the day of the auction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10251.

(a) If it is shown that it will be to the advantage of the estate, the court or judge may by order shorten the time of notice of sale to not less than five days.

(b) If the court or judge makes an order under subdivision (a), notice of sale shall be given by one or both of the following methods, as the personal representative may determine:

(1) By posting as provided in Section 10250 except that the posting shall be for at least five days instead of 15 days as required by Section 10250.

(2) By publication as provided in Section 10250 except that the publication shall be pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10252.

Personal property may be sold with or without notice, as the personal representative may determine, in any of the following cases:

(a) Where the property is directed by the will to be sold.

(b) Where authority is given in the will to sell the property.

(c) Where the property is perishable, will depreciate in value if not disposed of promptly, or will incur loss or expense by being kept.

(d) Where sale of the property is necessary to provide for the payment of a family allowance pending receipt of other sufficient funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10253.

(a) The notice of sale given pursuant to Section 10250 shall state all of the following:

(1) Whether the sale is to be a private sale or a public auction sale.

(2) In the case of a private sale, the place at which bids or offers will be received and a day on or after which the sale will be made or, in the case of a public auction sale, the time and place of sale.

(3) A brief description of the personal property to be sold.

(b) The notice of sale may state other matters in addition to those required by subdivision (a), including terms and conditions of sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10254.

(a) Unless the court orders otherwise pursuant to subdivision (b):

(1) A sale of personal property at a public auction sale shall be made within this state at the courthouse door, at the auction house, at some other public place, or at the residence of the decedent.

(2) No public auction sale shall be made of any tangible personal property that is not present at the time of sale.

(b) Upon petition of the personal representative or any interested person, the court may order either or both of the following:

(1) That a sale of personal property at public auction be made at any place within or without the United States.

(2) That tangible personal property need not be present at the time of sale. 

(c) The personal representative may postpone a public auction sale of personal property from time to time if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The personal representative believes that the postponement is to the advantage of the estate.

(2) Notice of the postponement is given by public declaration at the time and place appointed for the sale.

(3) The postponement, together with previous postponements of sale of the property, does not exceed three months.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10255.

(a) A private sale of personal property may not be made before the day stated in the notice of sale as the day on or after which the sale will be made, nor later than one year after that day.

(b) In the case of a private sale of personal property, the bids or offers shall be in writing and shall be left at the place designated in the notice of sale, or be delivered to the personal representative personally or to the person specified in the notice of sale, at any time after the first publication or posting of notice of sale and before the making of the sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10256.

Whether a sale of personal property is private or at public auction, bids shall substantially comply with any terms specified in the notice of sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10257.

(a) Personal property may be sold for cash or on credit.

(b) Except as may otherwise be ordered by the court pursuant to Section 10258, if a sale is made on credit, not less than 25 percent of the purchase price shall be paid in cash at the time of sale, and the personal representative shall do one of the following:

(1) Take the note of the purchaser for the balance of the purchase money, with a security interest in the personal propery sold, to secure the payment of the balance.

(2) Enter into a conditional sale contract under which title is retained until the balance is paid.

(c) The terms of the note and security interest or conditional sale contract shall be approved by the court at the time of confirmation of sale.

(d) Where property sold by the personal representative for part cash and part deferred payments consists of an undivided interest in personal property or any other interest therein less than the entire ownership and the owner or owners of the remaining interests therein join in the sale, the note and security interest may be made to the personal representative and such others having an interest in the property. The interest of the personal representative in the note and security interest shall be in the same interest and in the same proportions as the estate’s interest in the property prior to the sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10258.

(a) On petition of the personal representative, the court may by order authorize a sale of personal property on credit on terms providing for less than 25 percent of the purchase price to be paid in cash at the time of sale, or may waive or modify the requirement that a security interest or other lien shall be retained or taken to secure payment of the balance of the purchase price, where it is shown that the terms are to the advantage of the estate and the property to be sold is of such a nature that it is impracticable to sell the property for a larger cash payment at the time of sale or to retain a security interest or other lien in the property. The order of the court shall fix the terms and conditions of the sale.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be posted as provided in Section 1230 and given as provided in Section 1220 to all of the following persons:

(1) Each person listed in Section 1220.

(2) Each known heir whose interest in the estate would be affected by the sale.

(3) Each known devisee whose interest in the estate would be affected by the sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10259.

(a) Title to the following personal property passes upon sale without the need for court confirmation or approval:

(1) Personal property which is perishable, which will depreciate in value if not disposed of promptly, or which will incur loss or expense by being kept.

(2) Personal property the sale of which is necessary to provide for the payment of a family allowance pending receipt of other sufficient funds.

(b) Title to personal property sold at public auction passes without the need for court confirmation or approval upon receipt of the purchase price and:

(1) In the case of tangible personal property, the delivery of the property to the purchaser.

(2) In the case of intangible personal property, the delivery to the purchaser of the instrument that transfers the title to the property to the purchaser.

(c) The personal representative is responsible for the actual value of the property described in subdivision (a) or (b) unless the sale is reported to and approved by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10260.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 10200, 10201, 10202, 10259, and 10503, all sales of personal property shall be reported to and be confirmed by the court before title to the property passes to the purchaser, notwithstanding that the property is directed by the will to be sold or authority is given in the will to sell the property.

(b) If the personal representative fails to file the report and a petition for confirmation of the sale within 30 days after the sale, the purchaser at the sale may file the report and petition for confirmation of the sale.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition for confirmation filed under subdivision (a) or (b) shall be given as provided in Section 1220 and posted as provided in Section 1230.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10261.

(a) Except as provided in this subdivision, at the hearing on the petition for confirmation of the sale, the court shall examine into the necessity for the sale or the advantage to the estate and the benefit to the interested persons in making the sale. If the decedent’s will authorizes or directs the property to be sold, there need be no showing of the necessity of the sale or the advantage to the estate and the benefit to the interested persons in making the sale.

(b) Any interested person may file written objections to the confirmation of the sale at or before the hearing and may testify and produce witnesses in support of the objections.

(c) Before confirming the sale of a partnership interest, whether made to the surviving partner or to any other person, the court shall do both of the following:

(1) Inquire into the condition of the partnership affairs.

(2) Examine any surviving partner if that surviving partner is a resident within the state at the time of the hearing and able to be present in court. The court may issue a citation to compel the surviving partner to attend the hearing.

(d) Upon its own motion or upon the request of the personal representative, the agent or broker, or any other interested person, made at the time of the confirmation hearing or at another time, the court shall fix the compensation of the agent or broker as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10160).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10262.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if a written offer to purchase the property is made to the court at the hearing on the petition for confirmation of the sale and the new bid is at least 10 percent more than the amount stated in the report made to the court, the court in its discretion may accept the new bid and confirm the sale to the offeror, or may order a new sale, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The original bid as stated in the report to the court is more than one hundred dollars ($100) or, if the original bid is less than one hundred dollars ($100), the new bid is at least one hundred dollars ($100) more than the original bid.

(2) The new bid is made by a responsible person.

(3) The new bid complies with all provisions of law.

(b) If there is more than one offer that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a), the court shall do one of the following:

(1) Accept the highest such offer and confirm the sale to the offeror.

(2) Order a new sale.

(c) This section does not apply to a sale of property described in Section 10259.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10263.

If notice of the sale was required, before an order is made confirming the sale, it shall be proved to the satisfaction of the court that notice of the sale was given as required by this article, and the order of confirmation shall show that such proof was made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10264.

No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this article shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the sale pursuant to an order made under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Sale of Real Property [10300. - 10316.]

10300.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 10301 to 10303, inclusive, and in Section 10503, real property of the estate may be sold only after notice of sale has been published pursuant to Section 6063a of the Government Code (1) in a newspaper published in the county in which the real property or some portion thereof is located or (2) if there is no such newspaper, in such newspaper as the court or judge may direct.

(b) The publication of notice of sale shall be completed before:

(1) In the case of a private sale, the day specified in the notice as the day on or after which the sale is to be made.

(2) In the case of a public auction sale, the day of the auction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10301.

(a) If it appears from the inventory and appraisal that the value of the real property to be sold does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), the personal representative may in his or her discretion dispense with publication of notice of sale and, in lieu of publication, post the notice of sale at the courthouse of the county in which the real property or some portion thereof is located.

(b) Except as provided in Section 10302, posting pursuant to this section shall be for at least 15 days before:

(1) In the case of a private sale, the day specified in the notice of sale as the day on or after which the sale is to be made.

(2) In the case of a public auction sale, the day of the auction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10302.

(a) If it is shown that it will be to the advantage of the estate, the court or judge may by order shorten the time of notice of sale to not less than five days.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the court or judge makes an order under subdivision (a), notice of sale shall be published as provided in Section 10300 except that the publication shall be pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code.

(c) In a case described in Section 10301, if the court makes an order under subdivision (a), notice of sale shall be posted as provided in Section 10301 except that the notice of sale shall be posted at least five days before the sale instead of 15 days as required by Section 10301.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10303.

Real property may be sold with or without notice, as the personal representative may determine, in either of the following cases:

(a) Where the property is directed by the will to be sold.

(b) Where authority is given in the will to sell the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10304.

(a) The notice of sale given pursuant to this article shall state all of the following:

(1) Whether the sale is to be a private sale or a public auction sale.

(2) In the case of a private sale, the place at which bids or offers will be received and a day on or after which the sale will be made or, in the case of a public auction sale, the time and place of sale.

(3) The street address or other common designation or, if none, a legal description of the real property to be sold.

(b) The notice of sale may state other matters in addition to those required by subdivision (a), including terms and conditions of sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10305.

(a) A sale of real property at public auction shall be made in the county in which the property is located. If the property is located in two or more counties, it may be sold in any one of them.

(b) A sale of real property at public auction shall be made between 9 a.m. and 9 p.m., and the sale shall be made on the day specified in the notice of sale unless the sale is postponed.

(c) The personal representative may postpone a public auction sale of real property from time to time if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The personal representative believes that the postponement is to the advantage of the estate.

(2) Notice of the postponement is given by public declaration at the time and place appointed for the sale.

(3) The postponement, together with previous postponements of sale of the property, does not exceed three months in all.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10306.

(a) A private sale of real property may not be made before the day stated in the notice of sale as the day on or after which the sale will be made, nor later than one year after that day.

(b) In the case of a private sale of real property, the bids or offers shall be in writing and shall be left at the place designated in the notice of sale, or be delivered to the personal representative personally or to the person specified in the notice of sale, at any time after the first publication or posting of notice of sale and before the making of the sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10307.

Whether a sale of real property is private or at public auction, bids shall substantially comply with any terms specified in the notice of sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10308.

(a) Except as provided in Section 10503, all sales of real property shall be reported to and be confirmed by the court before title to the property passes to the purchaser, whether the sale is a private sale or a public auction sale and notwithstanding that the property is directed by the will to be sold or authority is given in the will to sell the property.

(b) If the personal representative fails to file the report and a petition for confirmation of the sale within 30 days after the sale, the purchaser at the sale may file the report and petition for confirmation of the sale.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition for confirmation filed under subdivision (a) or (b) shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to the persons designated by that section and to the purchasers named in the petition, and posted as provided in Section 1230.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 871, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10309.

(a) Except as provided in Section 10207, no sale of real property at private sale shall be confirmed by the court unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The real property has been appraised within one year prior to the date of the confirmation hearing.

(2) The valuation date used in the appraisal described in paragraph (1) is within one year prior to the date of the confirmation hearing.

(3) The sum offered for the property is at least 90 percent of the appraised value of the property as determined by the appraisal described in paragraph (1). 

(b) An appraisal of the property may be had at any time before the sale or the confirmation of sale in any of the following cases:

(1) Where the property has not been previously appraised.

(2) Where the property has not been appraised within one year before the date of the confirmation hearing.

(3) Where the valuation date used in the latest appraisal is more than one year before the date of the confirmation hearing.

(4) Where the court is satisfied that the latest appraisal is too high or too low.

(c) A new appraisal made pursuant to subdivision (b) need not be made by a probate referee if the original appraisal of the property was made by a person other than a probate referee. If the original appraisal of the property was made by a probate referee, the new appraisal may be made by the probate referee who made the original appraisal without further order of the court or further request for the appointment of a new probate referee. If appraisal by a probate referee is required, a new probate referee shall be appointed, using the same procedure as for the appointment of an original referee, to make the new appraisal if the original probate referee is dead, has been removed, or is otherwise unable to act, or if there is other reason to appoint another probate referee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10310.

(a) Except as provided in this subdivision, at the hearing on the petition for confirmation of the sale of the real property, the court shall examine into the necessity for the sale or the advantage to the estate and the benefit to the interested persons in making the sale. If the decedent’s will authorizes or directs the property to be sold, there need be no showing of the necessity of the sale or the advantage to the estate and benefit to the interested persons in making the sale.

(b) The court shall examine into the efforts of the personal representative to obtain the highest and best price for the property reasonably attainable.

(c) Any interested person may file written objections to the confirmation of the sale at or before the hearing and may testify and produce witnesses in support of the objections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10311.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e), and except as provided in Section 10207, if a written offer to purchase the real property is made to the court at the hearing on the petition for confirmation of the sale, the court shall accept the offer and confirm the sale to the offeror if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The offer is for an amount at least 10 percent more on the first ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of the original bid and 5 percent more on the amount of the original bid in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(2) The offer is made by a responsible person.

(3) The offer complies with all provisions of law.

(b) Subject to subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), if there is more than one offer that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a), the court shall accept the highest such offer and confirm the sale to the person making that offer.

(c) The court may, in its discretion, decline to accept the offer that satisfies the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b); and, in such case, the court shall order a new sale.

(d) If the sale returned for confirmation is on credit and the higher offer is for cash or on credit, whether on the same or different credit terms, or the sale returned for confirmation is for cash and the higher offer is on credit, the court may not consider the higher offer unless the personal representative informs the court in person or by counsel prior to confirmation of sale that the higher offer is acceptable.

(e) For the purpose of this section, the amount of the original bid and any higher offer shall be determined by the court without regard to any of the following:

(1) Any commission on the amount of the bid to which an agent or broker may be entitled under a contract with the personal representative.

(2) Any condition of the bid that a certain amount of the bid be paid to an agent or broker by the personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10312.

If notice of the sale was required, before an order is made confirming the sale it shall be proved to the satisfaction of the court that notice of the sale was given as required by this article, and the order of confirmation shall show that the proof was made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10313.

(a) The court shall make an order confirming the sale to the person making the highest offer that satisfies the requirements of this article, and directing conveyances or assignments or both to be executed, if it appears to the court that all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) Either the sale was authorized or directed to be made by the decedent’s will or good reason existed for the sale.

(2) If notice of the sale was required, the proof required by Section 10312 has been made.

(3) The sale was legally made and fairly conducted.

(4) The amount for which the sale is to be confirmed is not disproportionate to the value of the property.

(5) In the case of a private sale, the sale complied with the requirements of Section 10309.

(6) If the sale is confirmed to the original bidder, it does not appear that a sum exceeding the original bid by at least 10 percent more on the first ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of the original bid and 5 percent more on the amount of the original bid in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), exclusive of the expenses of a new sale, may be obtained.

(b) Upon its own motion or upon the request of the personal representative, the agent or broker, or any other interested person, made at the time of the confirmation hearing or at another time, the court shall fix the compensation of the agent or broker as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10160).

(c) If it appears to the court that the requirements of subdivision (a) are not satisfied, the court shall vacate the sale and order a new sale.

(d) If the court orders a new sale under subdivision (c) of this section or under subdivision (c) of Section 10311, notice of the new sale shall be given and the new sale shall in all respects be conducted as if no previous sale had taken place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10314.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), upon confirmation of the sale, the personal representative shall execute a conveyance to the purchaser which shall refer to the order confirming the sale and directing the conveyance to be executed. A certified copy of the order shall be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the real property or some portion thereof is located.

(b) Upon confirmation of a sale of the decedent’s interest under a contract for the purchase of real property by the decedent and after the purchaser has given a bond if one is required under Section 10206, the personal representative shall execute an assignment of the contract to the purchaser.

(c) A conveyance made in compliance with the court order confirming the sale and directing the conveyance to be executed vests in the purchaser both of the following:

(1) All the right, title, and interest which the decedent had in the property at the time of the decedent’s death.

(2) Any other or additional right, title, or interest in the property acquired by the estate of the decedent, by operation of law or otherwise, prior to the sale.

(d) An assignment made in compliance with the court order confirming the sale of the decedent’s interest under a contract for the purchase of real property by the decedent vests in the purchaser all the right, title, and interest of the estate, or of the persons entitled to the interest of the decedent, at the time of sale in the property assigned. The purchaser of the decedent’s interest under the contract for the purchase of the real property by the decedent has the same rights and remedies against the vendor of the property as the decedent would have had if living.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10315.

(a) If a sale is made on credit, the personal representative shall take the note of the purchaser for the unpaid portion of the purchase money, with a mortgage or deed of trust on the property to secure payment of the note. The mortgage or deed of trust shall be subject only to encumbrances existing at the date of sale and such other encumbrances as the court may approve.

(b) Where property sold by the personal representative for part cash and part deferred payments consists of an undivided interest in real property or any other interest therein less than the entire ownership and the owner or owners of the remaining interests therein join in the sale, the note and deed of trust or mortgage may be made to the personal representative and such others having an interest in the property. The interest of the personal representative in the note and deed of trust or mortgage shall be in the same interest and in the same proportions as the estate’s interest in the property prior to the sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10316.

No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this article shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the sale pursuant to an order made under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Vacating Sale for Purchaser’s Default; Liability of Defaulting Purchaser for Damages [10350. - 10351.]

10350.

(a) If after court confirmation of sale of real or personal property the purchaser fails to comply with the terms of sale, the court may, on petition of the personal representative, vacate the order of confirmation, order a resale of the property, and award damages to the estate against the purchaser.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to the persons designated by that section and the notice and a copy of the petition shall be given to the buyers and brokers named in the order confirming sale, except that notice need not be given to a defaulting purchaser whose written consent to the petition is filed with the court before the hearing.

(c) Notice of the resale of the property shall be given as provided in this chapter for a sale of the property in the first instance.

(d) Proceedings after notice of the resale shall be as provided in this chapter for a sale of the property in the first instance.

(e) If the property is resold, the defaulting purchaser is liable to the estate for damages equal to the sum of the following:

(1) The difference between the contract price of the first sale and the amount paid by the purchaser at the resale.

(2) Expenses made necessary by the purchaser’s breach.

(3) Other consequential damages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 871, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10351.

(a) The court may vacate the order of confirmation of a sale of real or personal property and make an order confirming the sale to the new high bidder if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) A petition is filed within 60 days after confirmation of the sale showing that (A) the purchaser at the sale has failed to complete the purchase and (B) a bid has been made for the property in the same or a higher amount, on the same or better terms, and in the manner prescribed in the original notice of sale. 

(2) The sale has not been vacated pursuant to Section 10350.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to the persons designated by that section and the notice and a copy of the petition shall be given to the buyers and brokers named in the order confirming sale, except that notice need not be given to a defaulting purchaser whose written consent to the vacation of the order confirming the sale is filed with the court prior to the hearing.

(c) If the report and petition for confirmation of the second sale are not filed within 60 days of the confirmation of the first sale, the property may be resold only in the manner provided in Section 10350.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 871, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Application of Sale Proceeds of Encumbered Property; Sale to Lienholder [10360. - 10363.]

10360.

As used in this article:

(a) “Amount secured by the lien” includes interest and any costs and charges secured by the lien.

(b) “Encumbered property” means real or personal property that is subject to a lien for a secured debt which is a valid claim against the estate and which has been allowed or approved.

(c) “Lien” means a mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10361.

(a) If encumbered property is sold, the purchase money shall be applied in the following order:

(1) Expenses of administration which are reasonably related to the administration of the property sold as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11420.

(2) The payment of the expenses of the sale.

(3) The payment and satisfaction of the amount secured by the lien on the property sold if payment and satisfaction of the lien is required under the terms of the sale.

(4) Application in the course of administration.

(b) The application of the purchase money, after the payment of those expenses set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), to the payment and satisfaction of the amount secured by the lien on the property sold shall be made without delay; and, subject to Section 10362, the property sold remains subject to the lien until the purchase money has been actually so applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10361.5.

The personal representative or any interested party may, at any time before payment is made to satisfy all liens on the encumbered property sold, petition for an order determining the amount of expenses of administration that are reasonably related to the administration of that encumbered property as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11420. The petition may be heard as part of a petition for confirmation of sale of personal or real property as provided in Section 10260 or 10308, respectively or may be heard separately. If the petition is presented as part of a petition for confirmation of sale of real or personal property, the notice of hearing otherwise required by this code for a petition for confirmation of sale shall be given in addition to the notice requirements under Section 10361.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10361.6.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the day of the hearing, the petitioner shall cause notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be served in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure on all of the following persons:

(1) The personal representative, if the personal representative is not the petitioner.

(2) The holder of any mortgage or other lien secured by the property that is sold.

(3) All agents or brokers entitled to compensation from the proceeds of the property that is sold.

(b) Except for those persons given notice pursuant to subdivision (a), notice of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition, shall be given as provided in Section 1220 to all of the following persons:

(1) Each person listed in Section 1220.

(2) Each known heir whose interest in the estate would be affected by the petition.

(3) Each known devisee whose interest in the estate would be affected by the petition.

(4) The Attorney General, at the office of the Attorney General in Sacramento, if any portion of the estate is to escheat to the state and its interest in the estate would be affected by the petition.

(c) The court may not shorten the time for giving the notice of hearing under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10362.

(a) If encumbered property is sold, the purchase money, or so much of the purchase money as is sufficient to pay the amount secured by the lien on the property sold and the expenses of the sale, may be paid to the clerk of the court. Upon the payment being so made, the lien on the property sold ceases.

(b) The clerk of court without delay shall use the money paid to the clerk under this section to pay the expenses of the sale and to pay and satisfy the amount secured by the lien on the property sold. The clerk shall at once return the surplus, if any, to the personal representative unless the court, for good cause shown and after notice to the personal representative, otherwise orders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10363.

(a) At a sale of real or personal property subject to a lien, the lienholder may become the purchaser of the property, even though no claim for the amount secured by the lien on the property sold has been, or could have been, filed, allowed, or approved.

(b) Unless the property is sold subject to the lien:

(1) If the lienholder becomes the purchaser of the property and the amount secured by the lien on the property is a valid claim against the estate and has been allowed or approved, the receipt of the lienholder for the amount due the lienholder from the proceeds of the sale is a payment pro tanto.

(2) If the lienholder becomes the purchaser of the property and no claim for the amount secured by the lien on the property has been filed, allowed, or approved, the court may at the hearing on the petition for confirmation of the sale examine into the validity and enforceability of the lien and the amount secured by the lien, and the court may authorize the personal representative to accept the receipt of the lienholder for the amount secured by the lien as payment pro tanto.

(3) If the lienholder becomes the purchaser of the property and the amount for which the property is purchased is insufficient to pay the expenses of the sale and to discharge the lienholder’s lien, whether or not a claim has been filed, allowed, or approved, the lienholder shall pay to the clerk of the court an amount sufficient to cover the expenses of the sale.

(c) Nothing permitted under this section shall be deemed to be an allowance or approval of a claim based upon the lien or the amount secured by the lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Damages and Recovery of Property [10380. - 10382.]

10380.

The personal representative is liable to an interested person for damages suffered by the interested person by reason of the neglect or misconduct of the personal representative in the proceedings in relation to a sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10381.

In addition to any other damages for which the personal representative is liable, if the personal representative fraudulently sells real property of the estate contrary to or otherwise than under the provisions of this chapter, the person having an estate of inheritance in the real property may recover from the personal representative, as liquidated damages, an amount equal to double the fair market value of the real property sold on the date of sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10382.

(a) No action for the recovery of property sold by a personal representative on the claim that the sale is void may be maintained by an heir or other person claiming under the decedent unless the action is commenced within whichever of the following is the later time:

(1) Three years after the settlement of the final account of the personal representative.
